Hawaii statutes.
§48E-19 Construction of this chapter.
The powers conferred by this chapter shall be supplemental to the powers
conferred by any other law. Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit a
county from providing for a pollution control project of the nature described
in this part as a public undertaking, improvement, or system under chapter 47
or 49. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next